Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1322
Filing prior to July 1, 1999; effect.

An effective financing statement filed on or before July 1, 1999, in accordance with section 52-1307, which has not lapsed on or before July 1, 1999, may be continued by the filing of a continuation statement in accordance with section 52-1314 in the office of the Secretary of State.

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 95.